Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.20.020

Purpose.

The aim and purpose of the University of Washington shall be to provide a liberal education in literature, science, art, law, medicine, military science and such other fields as may be established therein from time to time by the board of regents or by law.

[ 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28B.20.020. Prior: 1909 c 97 p 238 s 2; RRS s 4545; prior: 1897 c 118 s 183; 1893 c 122 s 6; 1890 p 395 s 2. Formerly RCW 28.77.020.]